Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Licenses to Traffic in Alcoholic Beverages
243.081.
Retail sale of alcoholic beverages on a delivery, to-go, or take-out basis — Prohibitions — Requirements — Exemptions regarding delivery vehicle signage — Application of other laws.

If authorized under its licensing statute, a license holder with the privilege of selling alcoholic beverages by the drink at retail shall be permitted to sell alcoholic beverages by the drink in a sealed container, and by the package in sealed original containers, on a delivery, to-go, or take-out basis, as follows:

The sale of alcoholic beverages pursuant to this section shall be in conjunction with the purchase of a prepared meal and only in quantities that a reasonable person would purchase with a meal;

Deliveries, if applicable, shall be made in a vehicle operated and owned by the licensee, the licensee’s employee, or an independent contractor or agent; and

Any person delivering alcoholic beverages shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

All licensees and their employees and independent contractors are prohibited from:

Selling alcohol in bulk quantities;

Completing sales in dry territories; or

Delivering:

Into dry territory;

To a minor under twenty-one (21) years of age; or

To an intoxicated person.

For purposes of this section, alcoholic drinks to go shall be:

Placed in a bag or other container that is secured in a manner that makes it visibly apparent if the container has been subsequently opened or tampered with; and

Transported in a locked glove compartment or the trunk or other area that is not a passenger area under KRS 189.530(5).

The department may, but is not required to, promulgate an administrative regulation that sets forth the:

Conditions under which sales may take place;

Days and times that sales may take place; and

The requirements for transportation of alcoholic drinks to go under this section.

For purposes of this section, vehicles used for deliveries shall be exempt from displaying the name and license number of the retail licensee selling the alcoholic beverages being delivered.

Except as provided in this section, sales of alcoholic beverages shall be subject to all of the statutes and administrative regulations relating to the retail sale of alcoholic beverages.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 20, § 1, effective March 15, 2021.

243.082.
Nonquota type 1 or NQ1 retail drink license — Issuance to a convention center or convention hotel complex, horse racetrack, automobile racetrack, railroad system, commercial airline system or charter flight system, or state park — Privileges, duties, and restrictions for eligible entities.

A “Nonquota type 1” or “NQ1” retail drink license may be issued to an applicant operating as, or in:

A convention center or a convention hotel complex;

A horse racetrack;

An automobile racetrack;

A railroad system;

A commercial airlines system or charter flight system; or

A state park.

Any licensee holding an NQ1 retail drink license located in a qualifying convention center or a convention hotel complex, horse racetrack, an automobile racetrack, or state park may purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises. The license shall permit all alcoholic beverage sales on the premises without additional supplemental licenses. The licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors. The holder of an NQ1 retail drink license under this section shall store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS

244.260

.

A qualifying convention center or a convention hotel complex holding an NQ1 retail drink license may also hold a supplemental hotel in-room service license.

A qualifying railroad system holding an NQ1 retail drink license may purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink or by the package, upon any train that includes a dining car and is operated by the licensee in the state. Sales shall be made only while the train is in motion. A railroad system holding an NQ1 retail drink license may sell alcoholic beverages in unbroken packages smaller than two hundred (200) milliliters of distilled spirits and one hundred (100) milliliters of wine and may purchase alcoholic beverages from nonresidents.

A qualifying commercial airlines system or charter flight system holding an NQ1 retail drink license may purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink, and by miniature bottle, for consumption upon regularly scheduled or charter flights of the licensee, in and out of Kentucky. The license shall authorize the licensee to store alcoholic beverages for retail sale at a location or locations, if operating from more than one (1) airport in Kentucky, as designated on the license application.

An NQ1 retail drink license may be issued to any qualifying applicant within a state park meeting the criteria established in KRS

241.010

so long as the state park is located, in whole or in part, within:

Any wet territory; or

Any precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under KRS

242.022

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 40, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 20, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; ch. 22, § 10, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 46, effective June 29, 2017.

243.083.
Restrictions on issuance of NQ2 retail drink licenses to certain restaurants or hotel dining facilities. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact Act 1978, ch. 432, § 8, effective June 1978; 2012, ch. 125, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; Repealed, reenacted, renumbered, and amended, 2013, ch. 121, § 18, effective June 25, 2015) was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 22, § 26, effective July 15, 2014.

243.084.
Nonquota type 2 or NQ2 retail drink license — Issuance to certain hotels, certain restaurants, airports, or riverboats — Privileges, duties, and restrictions for eligible entities.

A “Nonquota type 2” or “NQ2” retail drink license may be issued to an applicant operating as, or in:

A hotel that:

Contains at least fifty (50) sleeping units; and

Receives from its total food and alcoholic beverage sales at least fifty percent (50%) of its gross receipts from the sale of food;

A restaurant;

An airport;

A riverboat;

A distiller; or

A business located within, or adjacent to, an entertainment destination center licensed premises.

A holder of an NQ2 retail drink license may purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS

243.081

. The licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors. A distiller may purchase its own products for retail drink sales under KRS

243.0305

. The holder of an NQ2 retail drink license shall store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS

244.260

.

To qualify for an NQ2 license, a riverboat shall have a regular or alternative place of mooring in a wet county or city of this state.

If a riverboat moors or makes landfall in a location other than its regular or alternate regular place of mooring, all alcoholic beverages shall be kept locked.

A riverboat licensed under this subsection shall not take on or discharge passengers when mooring or making landfall in dry option territory.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 41, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 11, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 47, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 20, § 3, effective March 15, 2021.

243.086.
Nonquota type 3 or NQ3 retail drink license — Issuance to private club, dining car or bed and breakfast — Varying restrictions and authorizations for eligible entities.

A “Nonquota type 3” or “NQ3” retail drink license may be issued to an applicant operating as, or in:

A private club;

A dining car; or

A bed and breakfast.

The holder of an NQ3 retail drink license may purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises. The licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors. The holder of an NQ3 retail drink license shall store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS

244.260

.

A qualifying private club holding an NQ3 retail drink license shall exclude the general public from the licensed premises.

A qualifying bed and breakfast holding an NQ3 retail drink license shall only sell alcoholic beverages by the drink to paid overnight guests of the licensee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 42, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 11, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 48, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 102, § 17, effective July 15, 2020.

243.088.
Nonquota type 4 or NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license — Issuance to holders of quota retail drink license, microbrewery license, small farm winery license, or other businesses selling for consumption on premises — Permitted activities — Sales at service stations.

A “Nonquota type 4” or “NQ4” retail malt beverage drink license may be issued to the holder of a quota retail drink license, microbrewery license, small farm winery license, or any other business wishing to sell malt beverages by the drink for consumption on the premises only.

An NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license shall authorize the licensee to:

Sell malt beverages at retail by the drink from only the licensed premises for consumption at the licensed premises only; and

Purchase malt beverages only from a distributor.

The holder of an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license may also hold a nonquota retail malt beverage package license.

A nonquota retail malt beverage drink license shall not be issued to any premises from which gasoline and lubricating oil are sold or from which the servicing and repair of motor vehicles is conducted, unless there is maintained in inventory on the premises for sale at retail not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) of food, groceries, and related products valued at cost. For purposes of this subsection, the term “food and groceries” has the meaning provided in KRS

243.280

. This section shall not apply to any licensed premises that sells no fuel other than marine fuel.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 43, effective June 25, 2013.

243.089.
Authorized public consumption license issued in wet territory to commercial quadricycle business.

An “authorized public consumption” license or “APC” license may be issued in wet territory to an applicant operating as, or in a commercial quadricycle business.

The following qualifications are required before an APC license may be issued to a commercial quadricycle business for the operation of quadricycles on a public highway:

The applicant shall have a business office;

The applicant shall maintain general liability insurance of at least two million dollars ($2,000,000). No license shall be issued or renewed without written documentation of this insurance;

The applicant shall possess a permit issued by the local government that has jurisdiction to grant rights to the applicant to operate its business on public roadways and highways within a specific designated operational area as its premises; and

If the local government that has jurisdiction for the premises as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection chooses to issue permits under this section, that local government shall adopt an ordinance for operation of a commercial quadricycle business that contains:

Hours of operation;

Local licensing requirements;

Any additional insurance requirements;

Standards for the approval of authorized travel routes;

Safety and equipment standards;

Local inspection requirements;

Standards for vehicle operation; and

Standards for loading and unloading passengers.

A holder of an APC license that operates as a commercial quadricycle business:

May permit patrons to bring unopened packages of alcoholic beverages onto the licensed premises and open and drink them in nondescriptive plastic cups after boarding, and while riding, the quadricycle;

Shall not permit patrons to bring or possess any glass containers of alcoholic beverages on the quadricycle;

Shall not permit patrons to bring opened packages or drinks of alcoholic beverages from retail premises on the quadricycle;

Shall only permit patrons to drink and consume alcoholic beverages in nondescriptive plastic cups while riding the quadricycle; and

Shall not sell, permit, offer for sale, or provide or offer any samples of alcoholic beverages.

An employee driver of a commercial quadricycle business holding an APC license shall:

Be certified by the department’s server training in alcohol regulations (STAR) education program;

Not consume or be under the influence of alcoholic beverages or controlled substances while driving and operating a quadricycle; and

Not be convicted of any criminal offense or violation related to alcoholic beverages or controlled substances for a minimum period of two (2) years prior to employment.

Any local licensing fee imposed under KRS

243.060

or

243.070

for an APC license shall not exceed the amount imposed under KRS

243.030

for an APC license.

This section does not exempt the holder of an APC license from KRS Chapters 241 to 244 or any administrative regulation promulgated by the board, except as expressly stated in this section.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 80, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

243.090.
Date licenses expire — Reduction in fee for licenses less than six months — Renewals not to affect proceedings for violations — Term of renewals — Denial of renewal to delinquent taxpayer.

All licenses issued by the department, except special event licenses, temporary licenses, or licenses listed in subsection (5) of this section, shall be valid for a period of no more than a year. The board shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the year-round system for renewal of licenses. The system shall be designed to distribute the workload as uniformly as possible within the offices of the local administrators and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

Except for licenses listed in paragraph (b) of this subsection, all licenses issued after January 1, 2017, by a local administrator shall be valid for a period of no more than a year and shall be renewable upon the date established by the department for the expiration of state licenses issued for premises located in that county or city. During the first year following July 15, 2016, if the new date for renewal for the licensee does not occur on the date established by the department for the expiration of the licensee’s state license, the local administrator shall either:

Prorate the cost of the renewed license by proportionally reducing the cost of the renewed license if the new date for the renewal occurs prior to the expiration of a previous license; or

Provide a prorated provisional local license to cover any period of time between the expiration of the previous license and the new date for renewal if the new date for renewal occurs after the expiration of the licensee’s previous license.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to licenses issued by a consolidated local government, special event licenses, temporary licenses, or licenses listed in subsection (5) of this section.

When any person applies for a new license authorized under KRS Chapters 241 to 244, the person shall be charged, if the license is issued, the full fee for the respective license if six (6) months or more remain before the license is due to be renewed and one-half (1/2) the fee if less than six (6) months remain before the license is due to be renewed. No abatement of license fees shall be permitted to any person who held a license of the same kind for the same premises in the preceding license period and who was actually doing business under the license during the last month of the preceding license period.

The renewal by the department of any alcoholic beverage license shall not be construed to waive or condone any violation that occurred prior to the renewal and shall not prevent subsequent proceedings against the licensee.

All alcoholic beverage producers, wholesalers, or distributors may obtain or renew their licenses for either a one (1) year term or a two (2) year term.

The department may deny license renewal if the licensee is a delinquent taxpayer as defined in KRS

131.1815

.

HISTORY:

2554b-114, 2554b-117, 2554b-197: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 69; 1998, ch. 518, § 6, effective April 13, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 568, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 57, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 12, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

243.100.
Persons who may not be licensed — Evasion of license disqualification by certain persons — Direct shipper exemption.

An individual shall not become a licensee if the individual:

Has been convicted of any felony until five (5) years have passed from the date of conviction, release from custody or incarceration, parole, or termination of probation, whichever is later;

Has been convicted of any misdemeanor involving a controlled substance that is described in or classified pursuant to KRS Chapter 218A in the two (2) years immediately preceding the application;

Has been convicted of any misdemeanor directly or indirectly attributable to the use of alcoholic beverages in the two (2) years immediately preceding the application;

Is under the age of twenty-one (21) years; or

Has had any license relating to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, and transportation of alcoholic beverages revoked for cause or has been convicted of a violation of any statute within KRS Chapters 241 to 244, until the expiration of two (2) years from the date of the revocation or conviction.

A partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, corporation, governmental agency, or other business entity recognized by law shall not be licensed if:

Each principal owner, partner, member, officer, and director does not qualify under subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section;

It has had any license relating to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, and transportation of alcoholic beverages revoked for cause or has been convicted of a violation of any statute within KRS Chapters 241 to 244, until the expiration of two (2) years from the date of the revocation or conviction; or

Any principal owner, partner, member, officer, or director, or any business entity in which they were directly or indirectly interested, has had any license revoked for cause or has been convicted of a violation of any statute within KRS Chapters 241 to 244, until the expiration of the later of two (2) years from the date of the revocation or two (2) years from the date of conviction.

The provisions of subsection (1)(a) and (b) shall apply to anyone applying for a new license under this chapter after July 15, 1998, but shall not apply to those who renew a license that was originally issued prior to July 15, 1998, or an application for a supplemental license where the original license was issued prior to July 15, 1998.

A person shall not evade license disqualification by applying for a license through or under the name of a different person. The state administrators shall examine the ownership, membership, and management of all license applicants, and shall deny the application if a disqualified person has a direct or indirect interest in the applicant’s business. The department may issue administrative subpoenas and summonses to determine ownership of an applicant or to investigate alleged violations by a licensee.

A direct shipper license applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of this section, and shall instead follow the requirements set forth in KRS

243.027

.

History.

2554b-154: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 12a; 1978, ch. 194, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 522, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 20, § 4, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 61, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 62, § 50, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 102, § 4, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 19, effective March 12, 2021.

243.105.
Residence requirements for individual wholesaler. [Repealed.]

243.106.
Residence requirements for joint enterprise wholesaler. [Repealed.]

243.107.
Grandfather provisions as to wholesaler residence requirements. [Repealed.]

243.110.
Incompatible licenses.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each kind of license listed in KRS

243.030

shall be incompatible with every other kind listed in that section and no person or entity holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply for or hold a license of another kind listed in KRS

243.030

.

Each kind of license listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4) shall be incompatible with every other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4), and no person holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply for or hold a license of any other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4).

A brewery holding a license listed in KRS 243.040(5) or (8) shall not apply for or hold a license listed in KRS 243.040(3) or (4).

The holder of a quota retail package license may also hold a quota retail drink license, an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3 retail drink license, or a special nonbeverage alcohol license.

The holder of a transporter’s license may also hold a distilled spirits and wine storage license.

The holder of a distiller’s license may also hold a rectifier’s license, a special nonbeverage alcohol license, a winery license, or a small farm winery license.

A commercial airline system or charter flight system retail license, a commercial airline system or charter flight system transporter’s license, and a retail drink license if held by a commercial airline or charter flight system may be held by the same licensee.

A Sunday retail drink license and supplemental license may be held by the holder of a primary license.

The holder of a distiller’s, winery, small farm winery, brewer, microbrewery, distilled spirits and wine supplier’s, or malt beverage supplier’s license may also hold a direct shipper license.

The holder of an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, or a limited restaurant license may also hold a limited nonquota package license.

Any person may hold two (2) or more licenses of the same kind.

A person or entity shall not evade the prohibition against applying for or holding licenses of two (2) kinds by applying for a second license through or under the name of a different person or entity. The state administrator shall examine the ownership, membership, and management of applicants, and shall deny the application for a license if the applicant is substantially interested in a person or entity that holds an incompatible license.

HISTORY:

2554b-128, 2554b-130: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 380, § 2; 1976, ch. 381, § 4; 1996, ch. 95, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 121, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 179, § 9, effective January 1, 2007; 2013, ch. 121, § 58, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 26, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 62, § 51, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 80, § 16, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 102, § 18, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 6, effective March 12, 2021; 2022 ch. 39, § 7, effective March 29, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.115.
Removal of partially consumed bottle of wine from restaurant licensed under KRS 243.030.

A restaurant licensed under KRS

243.030

may permit a patron of the restaurant to remove one (1) opened container of wine from the restaurant’s premises for consumption off the premises if the patron has purchased and partially consumed the bottle of wine with a meal on the restaurant’s premises.

A partially consumed bottle of wine that is removed from the premises shall be securely resealed by the restaurant licensee or its employee before the bottle is removed from the premises. The partially consumed bottle of wine shall be placed in a bag or other container that is secured in a manner that makes it visibly apparent if the container has been subsequently opened or tampered with, and the licensee shall provide a dated receipt for the wine to the patron.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 76, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

243.117.
Placement of resealed bottle of wine during transport.

If a patron removes a resealed bottle of wine from the premises of a restaurant as provided for in KRS

243.115

, any resealed bottle of wine that is transported in a motor vehicle shall be placed in a locked glove compartment or the trunk or other area that is not a passenger area under KRS 189.530(5).

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 76, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

243.120.
Business authorized by distiller’s, rectifier’s, or winery license — Class A and Class B distiller’s and rectifier’s licenses — Distiller’s sale of distilled spirits by the drink.

A distiller’s, rectifier’s, or winery license shall authorize the licensee to engage in the business of distiller, rectifier, or winery at the premises specifically designated in the license, to maintain aging warehouses, and to transport for himself or herself only any alcoholic beverage which he or she is authorized under the license to manufacture or sell. The licensee shall transport alcoholic beverages only by a vehicle operated by himself or herself, which has affixed to its sides at all times a sign of form and size prescribed by the state board, containing among other things the name and license number of the licensee.

A licensee holding a distiller’s license, Class A license, or Class B license shall distill no less than six hundred (600) gallons in one (1) year at the distillery’s licensed premises.
(2) (a) 1. A licensee holding a distiller’s license, Class A license, or Class B license shall distill no less than six hundred (600) gallons in one (1) year at the distillery’s licensed premises.

A licensee that engages in the distilling process for the exclusive purpose of providing training and education, conducting research, or teaching about the distilling process, aging, or bottling of distilled spirits shall be exempt from subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, so long as the licensee does not produce spirits for sale to the general public.

Distillers that produce more than fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of distilled spirits per calendar year at the premises shall obtain a distiller’s license, Class A.

Distillers that produce fifty thousand (50,000) gallons or less of distilled spirits per calendar year at the premises shall obtain a distiller’s license, Class B (craft distillery).

Rectifiers that rectify more than fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of distilled spirits per calendar year at the premises shall obtain a rectifier’s license, Class A.

Rectifiers that rectify fifty thousand (50,000) gallons or less of distilled spirits per calendar year at the premises shall obtain a rectifier’s license, Class B (craft rectifier).

A distiller that is located in wet territory, or in any precinct that has authorized the limited sale of alcoholic beverages at distilleries under KRS

242.1243

, may sell distilled spirits by the drink or by the package at retail to consumers in accordance with KRS

243.0305

.

Any distilled spirits sold under this subsection shall be taxed and distributed in the same manner as sales under KRS

243.0305

(2).

Except as provided in this subsection, sales under this subsection shall be governed by all of the statutes and administrative regulations governing the retail sale of distilled spirits by the drink.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Vitiate the policy of this Commonwealth supporting an orderly three (3) tier system for the production and sale of alcoholic beverages; or

Allow delivery or shipment of alcohol into dry or moist territory.

History.

2554b-118: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, §§ 1, 10; 1950, ch. 176, § 8; 1986, ch. 14, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 121, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 289, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 121, § 59, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 12, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 80, § 13, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 164, § 2, effective April 13, 2018; 2020 ch. 102, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 35, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 13, § 16, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 13 and 35, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

243.130.
Transactions permitted to brewers, distillers, rectifiers, and wineries.

Sales and deliveries of distilled spirits and wine may be made at wholesale, and from the licensed premises only:

By distillers to rectifiers, wineries, holders of special nonbeverage alcohol licenses so far as they may make the purchases, or other distillers;

By rectifiers to wineries or to distillers if distilled spirits sold to distillers are packaged in retail containers;

By wineries to rectifiers or other wineries, or to the holders of special nonbeverage alcohol licenses;

By distillers, rectifiers, or wineries to wholesalers; or

By distillers, rectifiers, or wineries for export out of the state.

No distiller, rectifier, or winery shall sell or contract to sell, give away, or deliver any alcoholic beverages to any person who is not authorized by the law of the state of the person’s residence, and of the United States government if located in the United States, to receive and possess those alcoholic beverages. Except as provided in KRS

243.027

to

243.029

and KRS

243.0305

, no distiller, rectifier, or winery shall sell or contract to sell, give away, or deliver any of its products to any retailer or consumer in Kentucky.

Employees of distillers, rectifiers, and wineries may sample the products produced by that manufacturer for purposes of education, quality control, and product development.

Distillers may purchase distilled spirits only from other licensed distillers in this state or in another state or province, but distillers may purchase from rectifiers licensed in Kentucky, distilled spirits which are packaged in retail containers.

Rectifiers may purchase malt, distilled spirits and wine only from licensed brewers, distillers or wineries in Kentucky, or from nonresident brewers, distillers or wineries authorized by the law of the state of their residence and by the United States government, if the brewers, distillers or wineries are located in or outside the United States, to make the sales.

Wineries may purchase distilled spirits or wine only from licensed distillers or wineries in Kentucky, or from nonresident distillers or wineries authorized by law of the state of their residence, and by the United States government if located in the United States, to make the sales.

Nothing shall prohibit the purchase or sale of warehouse receipts by any person, but this subsection does not authorize the owner of a warehouse receipt to accept delivery of any distilled spirits unless the owner is a person who is permitted by law to receive the distilled spirits.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Vitiate the policy of this Commonwealth supporting an orderly three (3) tier system for the production and sale of alcoholic beverages; or

Allow delivery or shipment of alcohol into dry or moist territory.

History.

2554b-119: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 60, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 52, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 164, § 3, effective April 13, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 17, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 17, effective March 12, 2021.

243.140.
Business authorized by blender’s license. [Repealed.]

243.150.
Business authorized by brewer’s license — Sale and service of malt beverages — Sampling by employees.

A brewer’s license shall authorize the licensee to engage in the business of a brewer at the premises specifically designated in the license, and to transport for itself only any malt beverage which the licensee is authorized by its license to manufacture or sell, but the licensee shall transport any malt beverages in accordance with the requirements provided by KRS

243.120

for distillers.

A brewer may sell any malt beverage produced under its license to:

A licensed wholesaler from the licensed premises;

Any of its employees for home consumption;

Charitable or fraternal organizations holding group meetings, picnics, or outings;

A customer, strictly limited to the following types of sales on the premises of a brewery located in wet territory:

By the drink sales for consumption on the premises only, to be conducted in a taproom or similar space that is located at the licensed brewery; and

Package sales for off-premises consumption only by using a refillable, resealable growler; and

Consumers, if the brewer holds a direct shipper license under KRS

243.027

to

243.029

.

A licensed brewer may buy malt beverages from another licensed brewer in this state or nonresident brewer authorized by the law of the state of its residence, and by the United States government if located in the United States, to make these sales;

Employees of a licensed brewer may sample the products produced by that manufacturer for purposes of education, quality control, and product development.

A brewer may serve on the licensed premises of its brewery complimentary samples of malt beverages produced at the brewery in an amount not to exceed sixteen (16) ounces per patron per day, if the brewery is located in wet territory.

History.

2554b-198: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 205, § 1; 1996, ch. 72, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2013, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 14, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 53, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 80, § 18, effective July 15, 2020.

243.154.
Business authorized by small farm winery wholesaler’s license — Licensed premises on small farm winery.

A small farm winery wholesaler’s license shall authorize the licensee:

To purchase, receive, store, or possess wine produced by small farm winery licensees;

To sell the wine at wholesale from the licensed premises only; and

To transport from the licensed premises for himself or herself only any wine produced by small farm winery licensees that the small farm winery wholesaler’s license authorizes him or her to sell.

A small farm winery wholesaler licensed under this section shall:

Transport the wine in the manner provided for manufacturers in KRS

243.120

; and

Transport the wine from a small farm winery’s licensed premises or another wholesaler’s premises to the small farm winery wholesaler’s premises.

A small farm winery wholesaler licensed under this section shall not purchase, receive, store, possess, sell, or transport wine or distilled spirits, except as provided in this section, and shall comply with all provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes applicable to wholesalers licensed under KRS

243.030

, to the extent the provisions are not inconsistent with this section.

A small farm winery wholesaler licensed under this section shall be allowed to have its licensed premises on or in the licensed premises of a small farm winery.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 179, § 15, effective January 1, 2007; 2013, ch. 121, § 61, effective June 25, 2013.